Hawaii statutes.
[§11-342] Fundraiser; notice of
intent. (a) No fundraiser shall be held unless a notice of intent to hold
the fundraiser is filed with the commission setting forth the name and address
of the person in charge, the price per person, the date, hour, and place of the
fundraiser, and the method thereof.

(b) The person in charge of the fundraiser
shall file the notice with the commission prior to the fundraiser.

(c) As used in this section, "fundraiser"
means any function held for the benefit of a candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee that is intended or designed, directly or indirectly, to
raise contributions for which the price or suggested contribution for attending
the function is more than $25 per person. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next